New York, session 2025-2026, S7891.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 756 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 756. Media literacy materials. 1. For the purposes of this section, 4 the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 a. "digital citizenship" means a diverse set of skills related to 6 current technology and social media, including the norms of appropriate, 7 responsible, and healthy behavior. 8 b. "media literacy" means the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, 9 and use media and encompasses the foundational skills that lead to 10 digital citizenship. 11 2. On or before July first, two thousand twenty-six, the department 12 shall make available to school districts on its internet website a list 13 of resources and instructional materials on media literacy, including 14 media literacy professional development programs for teachers. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04695-01-5